Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1527
Sale of land; prior sale set aside; readvertisement.

The officer holding such writ shall immediately advertise and sell said real estate, lands and tenements agreeable to the provisions of this chapter, and shall readvertise and sell the same in case a prior sale has been set aside by the district court or a judge thereof. In case the real estate offered for sale shall not be sold for want of bidders, the sheriff shall, at the request of the plaintiff, readvertise and again offer said property for sale under the said writ.

Laws 1875, § 4, p. 61;

R.S.1913, § 8071;

Laws 1915, c. 149, § 1, p. 319;

C.S.1922, § 9009;

C.S.1929, § 20-1527;

R.S.1943, § 25-1527.

Amendatory act of 1915 was not unconstitutional; appraisal is no longer prerequisite to sale of land under execution of foreclosure decree. Conservative Savings & Loan Assn. of Omaha v. Anderson, 116 Neb. 627, 218 N.W. 423 (1928); Norris v. Tower, 102 Neb. 434, 167 N.W. 728 (1918).

Until bid is accepted it is a mere proposal and may be withdrawn by bidder. Strode v. Hoagland, 76 Neb. 542, 107 N.W. 754 (1906).

Notice of sale, published every issue of weekly newspaper for thirty days before sale, is sufficient. Cuyler v. Tate, 67 Neb. 317, 93 N.W. 675 (1903).

There is no statutory authority for adjournment of sale. Fraaman v. Fraaman, 64 Neb. 472, 90 N.W. 245 (1902).

Sale must be made in accordance with terms of decree, and terms cannot be changed by agreement of parties. Nebraska Loan & Trust Co. v. Hamer, 40 Neb. 281, 58 N.W. 695 (1894).

Rule requiring bidder to put up fifty dollars as guarantee of good faith before acceptance of bid was not unreasonable. Michigan Mut. L. Ins. Co. v. Klatt, 5 Neb. Unof. 305, 98 N.W. 436 (1904).

Tract of two hundred acres, mortgaged as a whole, may be sold in one tract. Pierce v. Reed, 3 Neb. Unof. 874, 93 N.W. 154 (1903).

If plaintiff is purchaser, cash payment is not essential. Campbell v. Gawlewicz, 3 Neb. Unof. 321, 91 N.W. 569 (1902).

Sheriff may be justified in refusing to sell on account of complicated condition of title. Porter v. Trompen, 2 Neb. Unof. 76, 96 N.W. 226 (1901).